Washington statutes.
RCW 41.18.170

Application of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter governing contributions, pensions, and benefits shall have exclusive application (1) to firefighters as defined in this chapter hereafter becoming members of a fire department, (2) to firefighters as defined in this chapter heretofore employed in a department who have not otherwise elected as provided for in RCW 41.18.160, and (3) to firefighters on disability retirement under chapter 41.16 RCW, at the effective date of this chapter, who thereafter shall have been returned to active duty by the retirement board, and who have not otherwise elected as provided for in RCW 41.18.160 within sixty days after return to active duty.

[ 2007 c 218 s 58; 1955 c 382 s 16.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.